Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.060

Penalties—Grounds.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

(1) In any case in which the department finds that a licensee, or any partner, officer, director, owner of five percent or more of the assets of the nursing home, or managing employee failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter or of chapter 74.42 RCW, or the standards, rules, and regulations established under them or, in the case of a medicaid contractor, failed or refused to comply with the medicaid requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder, the department may take any or all of the following actions:

(a) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license;

(b) Order stop placement;

(c) Assess monetary penalties of a civil nature;

(d) Deny payment to a nursing home for any medicaid resident admitted after notice to deny payment. Residents who are medicaid recipients shall not be responsible for payment when the department takes action under this subsection;

(e) Appoint temporary management as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(2) The department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license, assess monetary penalties of a civil nature, or both, in any case in which it finds that the licensee, or any partner, officer, director, owner of five percent or more of the assets of the nursing home, or managing employee:

(a) Operated a nursing home without a license or under a revoked or suspended license; or

(b) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of a material fact in his or her application for license or any data attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the department; or

(c) Refused to allow representatives or agents of the department to inspect all books, records, and files required to be maintained or any portion of the premises of the nursing home; or

(d) Willfully prevented, interfered with, or attempted to impede in any way the work of any duly authorized representative of the department and the lawful enforcement of any provision of this chapter or of chapter 74.42 RCW; or

(e) Willfully prevented or interfered with any representative of the department in the preservation of evidence of any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of chapter 74.42 RCW or the standards, rules, and regulations adopted under them; or

(f) Failed to report patient abuse or neglect in violation of chapter 70.124 RCW; or

(g) Fails to pay any civil monetary penalty assessed by the department pursuant to this chapter within ten days after such assessment becomes final.

(3) The department shall deny payment to a nursing home having a medicaid contract with respect to any medicaid-eligible individual admitted to the nursing home when:

(a) The department finds the nursing home not in compliance with the requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder, and the facility has not complied with such requirements within three months; in such case, the department shall deny payment until correction has been achieved; or

(b) The department finds on three consecutive standard surveys that the nursing home provided substandard quality of care; in such case, the department shall deny payment for new admissions until the facility has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the department that it is in compliance with medicaid requirements and that it will remain in compliance with such requirements.

(4)(a) Civil penalties collected under this section or under chapter 74.42 RCW shall be deposited into a special fund administered by the department to be applied to the protection of the health or property of residents of nursing homes found to be deficient, including payment for the costs of relocation of residents to other facilities, maintenance of operation of a facility pending correction of deficiencies or closure, and reimbursement of residents for personal funds lost.

(b) Civil monetary penalties, if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest, for each day a nursing home is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary penalties shall not exceed three thousand dollars per violation. Each day upon which the same or a substantially similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment of a separate penalty.

(c) Any civil penalty assessed under this section or chapter 74.46 RCW shall be a nonreimbursable item under chapter 74.46 RCW.

(5)(a) The department shall order stop placement on a nursing home, effective upon oral or written notice, when the department determines:

(i) The nursing home no longer substantially meets the requirements of chapter 18.51 or 74.42 RCW, or in the case of medicaid contractors, the requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under such statutes; and

(ii) The deficiency or deficiencies in the nursing home:

(A) Jeopardize the health and safety of the residents, or

(B) Seriously limit the nursing home's capacity to provide adequate care.

(b) When the department has ordered a stop placement, the department may approve a readmission to the nursing home from a hospital when the department determines the readmission would be in the best interest of the individual seeking readmission.

(c) The department shall terminate the stop placement when:

(i) The provider states in writing that the deficiencies necessitating the stop placement action have been corrected; and

(ii) The department staff confirms in a timely fashion not to exceed fifteen working days that:

(A) The deficiencies necessitating stop placement action have been corrected, and

(B) The provider exhibits the capacity to maintain adequate care and service.

(d) A nursing home provider shall have the right to an informal review to present written evidence to refute the deficiencies cited as the basis for the stop placement. A request for an informal review must be made in writing within ten days of the effective date of the stop placement.

(e) A stop placement shall not be delayed or suspended because the nursing home requests a hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW or an informal review. The stop placement shall remain in effect until:

(i) The department terminates the stop placement; or

(ii) The stop placement is terminated by a final agency order, after a hearing, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) If the department determines that an emergency exists as a result of a nursing home's failure or refusal to comply with requirements of this chapter or, in the case of a medicaid contractor, its failure or refusal to comply with medicaid requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and rules adopted thereunder, the department may suspend the nursing home's license and order the immediate closure of the nursing home, the immediate transfer of residents, or both.

(7) If the department determines that the health or safety of residents is immediately jeopardized as a result of a nursing home's failure or refusal to comply with requirements of this chapter or, in the case of a medicaid contractor, its failure or refusal to comply with medicaid requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and rules adopted thereunder, the department may appoint temporary management to:

(a) Oversee the operation of the facility; and

(b) Ensure the health and safety of the facilities residents while:

(i) Orderly closure of the facility occurs; or

(ii) The deficiencies necessitating temporary management are corrected.

(8) The department shall by rule specify criteria as to when and how the sanctions specified in this section shall be applied. Such criteria shall provide for the imposition of incrementally more severe penalties for deficiencies that are repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or present a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of the residents.

[ 2011 c 336 s 486; 1989 c 372 s 8; 1987 c 476 s 23; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 18; 1979 ex.s. c 228 s 10; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 2; 1953 c 160 s 5; 1951 c 117 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.